Massachusetts, session 194th, H72.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 166A of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after section 10 the
following section:-
Section 10A. If an issuing authority determines that a licensee has violated a condition of
their license, the matter shall be referred to the department of telecommunications and cable for
further review and action pursuant to section 11. If a settlement agreement is reached between
the issuing authority and a licensee, the department shall review and approve the agreement;
provided, that the department shall not approve the agreement if the department determines that
the agreement is not in the best interest of impacted subscribers.
of 1